languages/apertium-cym/apertium-cym.cym.dix
    <pardef n="aberth__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>au</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="carn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>au</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bl/aidd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aidd</l>
          <r>aidd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiddiaid</l>
          <r>aidd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="achosiant__n">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="actores__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>au</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cyll/ell__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>ell<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yll</l>
          <r>ell<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="i/ard__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ard</l>
          <r>ard<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erdydd</l>
          <r>ard<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="academydd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ion</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="anhapusrwydd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dwyfoch__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="addysg__n">
      <!-- Changed 'sp' to 'sg' -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gwawr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amlap__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iau</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="addasw/r__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yr</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aber__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oedd</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="achlysur__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="amlin__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iau</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="archfarchnad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oedd</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="batri__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="amlochron__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nau</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ardrefnian/t__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nau</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ysb/ïwr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ïwr</l>
          <r>ïwr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wyr</l>
          <r>ïwr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="apel/iwr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iwr</l>
          <r>iwr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wyr</l>
          <r>iwr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="acer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adeilad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>au</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="arglwydd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="amlen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adran__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nau</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="acen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ion</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="allanf/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eydd</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="blaidd"><par n="initial-b"/><i>l</i><par n="bl/aidd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="carn"><par n="initial-c"/><i>arn</i><par n="carn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cyllid"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yllid</i><par n="aberth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cyllell"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yll</i><par n="cyll/ell__n"/></e>
    <e lm="logarithm"><i>logarithm</i><par n="aberth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iard"><i>i</i><par n="i/ard__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iard chwarae"><i>i</i><par n="i/ard__n"/><p><l><b/>chwarae</l><r><g><b/>chwarae</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="gwyddor"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wyddor</i><par n="actores__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anogiaeth"><i>anogiaeth</i><par n="adeilad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cymysgedd"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ymysgedd</i><par n="adeilad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arwynebeddau"><i>arwynebeddau</i><par n="achosiant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="DU"><i>DU</i><par n="aberth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cyfoeth"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yfoeth</i><par n="achosiant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ionawr"><i>Ionawr</i><par n="achosiant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dwyfoch"><par n="initial-d"/><i>wyfoch</i><par n="dwyfoch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwawr"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wawr</i><par n="gwawr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gaeleg"><par n="initial-G"/><i>aeleg</i><par n="addysg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="unigolyddiaeth"><i>unigolyddiaeth</i><par n="addysg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cysgod"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ysgod</i><par n="academydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hepgor"><i>hepgor</i><par n="academydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gafael"><par n="initial-g"/><i>afael</i><par n="acen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prifysgol"><par n="initial-p"/><i>rifysgol</i><par n="acen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gofid"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ofid</i><par n="amlap__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fflach"><i>fflach</i><par n="amlin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="siec"><i>siec</i><par n="amlin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="darparwr"><par n="initial-d"/><i>arparw</i><par n="addasw/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hysbysebwr"><i>hysbysebw</i><par n="addasw/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grym"><par n="initial-g"/><i>rym</i><par n="aber__n"/></e>
    <e lm="metel"><par n="initial-m"/><i>etel</i><par n="aber__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwe"><par n="initial-g"/><i>we</i><par n="archfarchnad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stafell"><i>stafell</i><par n="archfarchnad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hufen"><i>hufen</i><par n="amlochron__n"/></e>
    <e lm="troedyn"><par n="initial-t"/><i>roedyn</i><par n="amlochron__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clorian"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lorian</i><par n="adran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elusen"><i>elusen</i><par n="adran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cartref"><par n="initial-c"/><i>artref</i><par n="arglwydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paced"><par n="initial-p"/><i>aced</i><par n="arglwydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cerdd"><par n="initial-c"/><i>erdd</i><par n="acer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ffenestr"><i>ffenestr</i><par n="acer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cyfrifiadur"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yfrifiadur</i><par n="achlysur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meddyg"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eddyg</i><par n="achlysur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cwsg"><par n="initial-c"/><i>wsg</i><par n="anhapusrwydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="melfed"><par n="initial-m"/><i>elfed</i><par n="anhapusrwydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="domino"><par n="initial-d"/><i>omino</i><par n="batri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="refferendwm"><i>refferendwm</i><par n="batri__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwelliant"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wellian</i><par n="ardrefnian/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tyfiant"><par n="initial-t"/><i>yfian</i><par n="ardrefnian/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ysbïwr"><i>ysb</i><par n="ysb/ïwr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cyn-fyfyriwr"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yn-fyfyr</i><par n="apel/iwr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dyluniwr"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ylun</i><par n="apel/iwr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dolen"><par n="initial-d"/><i>olen</i><par n="amlen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mantolen"><par n="initial-m"/><i>antolen</i><par n="amlen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cloddfa"><par n="initial-c"/><i>loddf</i><par n="allanf/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="noddfa"><i>noddf</i><par n="allanf/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dydd Sul"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ydd</i><par n="amlap__n"/><p><l><b/>Sul</l><r><g><b/>Sul</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="nos Lun"><i>nos</i><par n="actores__n"/><p><l><b/>Lun</l><r><g><b/>Lun</g></r></p></e>
